Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 5. Administration of Abandoned Property.

Sec. 34.45.360.
Public sale of abandoned property.

Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this section, the department, within three years after receiving abandoned property, shall sell it to the highest bidder at public sale in the area of the state that the department determines to be the most favorable market for the property involved. The department may decline the highest bid and reoffer the property for sale if in the judgment of the department the bid is insufficient. If in the judgment of the department the probable cost of sale exceeds the value of the property, the department need not offer the property for sale. A sale held under this section must be preceded by a single publication of notice, at least three weeks in advance of sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the general area in which the property is to be sold.

Securities listed on an established stock exchange must be sold at prices prevailing at the time of sale on the exchange. Other securities may be sold over the counter at prices prevailing at the time of sale or by another method the department considers advisable.

Unless the department considers it to be in the best interest of the state to do otherwise, the department shall hold all securities that have been delivered to the department, other than those presumed abandoned under AS

34.45.200

, for at least one year before the department may sell the securities.

Unless the department considers it to be in the best interest of the state to do otherwise, the department shall hold all securities presumed abandoned under AS

34.45.200

and delivered to the department for at least three years before selling the securities. A person making a claim under AS

34.45.380

is entitled to receive either the securities delivered to the department by the holder, if they still remain in the hands of the department, or the proceeds received from sale, less amounts deducted under AS

34.45.380

(c). A person does not have a claim under this section or AS 34.45.380 against the state, the holder, a transfer agent, a registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder for appreciation in the value of the property occurring after delivery by the holder to the department.

The purchaser of property at a sale conducted by the department under this section takes the property free of all claims of the owner or previous holder of the property and of all persons claiming through or under them. The department shall execute all documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.370.
Deposit of money and accounting.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, the department shall promptly deposit in the general fund of the state all money received under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

, including the proceeds from the sale of abandoned property under AS

34.45.360

. The department shall retain in a separate trust fund an amount not less than $100,000 from which the department shall make prompt payment of allowed claims. Before making the deposit, the department shall record the name and last known address of each person appearing from the holders’ reports to be entitled to the property and the name and last known address of each insured person or annuitant and beneficiary and, with respect to each policy or contract listed in the report of an insurance company, its number, the name of the company, and the amount due. The department shall make the record available for public inspection at all reasonable business hours.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Sec. 34.45.380.
Filing of claim with department.

A person, excluding another state, claiming an interest in property paid or delivered to the department may file a claim on a form prescribed by the department and bearing a notice that statements are made under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree.

The department shall consider each claim after it is filed and shall give written notice to the claimant if the claim is denied in whole or in part. The notice may be given by mailing it to the address, if any, stated in the claim as the address to which notices are to be sent. If an address for notices is not stated in the claim, the notice may be mailed to the address, if any, of the claimant as stated in the claim. A notice of denial need not be given if the claim states neither the address to which notices are to be sent nor the address of the claimant.

If a claim is allowed, the department shall pay or deliver to the claimant the property or the amount the department actually received, or the net proceeds if it has been sold by the department, together with an additional amount required by AS

34.45.340

. For the purposes of determining net proceeds after sale of the property, the department may deduct

costs incurred in connection with the sale of the property;

costs of mailing and publication in connection with the property;

reasonable service charges; and

costs incurred in examining records of the holder of the property and in collecting the property from the holder.

If a claim is allowed and the property claimed was interest-bearing to the owner on the date of surrender by the holder, the department also shall pay interest at the rate prescribed in AS

45.45.010

or a lesser rate the property earned while in the possession of the holder. Interest begins to accrue when the property is delivered to the department and ceases on the expiration of 10 years after delivery or the date on which payment is made to the owner, whichever is earlier. The department may not pay interest on interest-bearing property for a period occurring before September 7, 1986.

A holder who pays the owner for property that has been delivered to the state and that, if claimed from the department, would be subject to (d) of this section shall add interest as provided in (d) of this section. The added interest shall be repaid to the holder by the commissioner in the same manner as the principal.

Unless another state files a claim to recover the property, if the identity of the owner of the property is known, the department shall apply the fair market value of the property to satisfaction of the following, in the order listed:

the child support obligations of the owner;

upon application of the Department of Law or submission of documentation satisfactory to the Department of Revenue, court-ordered restitution owed by the owner under AS 12 or AS 47, including any interest, collection costs, and attorney fees awarded by the court.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 48 ch 65 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 122 SLA 2002; am § 20 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 2, ch. 122, SLA 2002, the 2002 amendment to subsection (f) applies to a payment made by the Department of Revenue under this chapter on or after July 6, 2002.

Sec. 34.45.390.
Claim of another state to recover property.

After personal property has been paid or delivered to the department under this chapter another state may recover the property if

this state took custody of the property because the records of the holder did not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner when the property was presumed abandoned under this chapter, the person entitled to the property was in the other state, and under the laws of the other state the property escheated to or was subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property, as reflected by the records of the holder, is in the other state and under the laws of the other state the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

the records of the holder were erroneous in that they did not accurately reflect the actual owner of the property and the last known address of the actual owner is in the other state and under the laws of the other state the property escheated to or was subject to a claim of abandonment by the other state;

this state took custody of the property under AS

34.45.120

(6), and, under the laws of the state of domicile of the holder, the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim of abandonment by the state of domicile; or

the property is the sum payable on a traveler’s check, money order, or other similar instrument of which this state took custody under AS

34.45.140

, and the instrument was purchased in the other state, and, under the laws of the other state, the property escheated to or became subject to a claim of abandonment by the other state.

The claim of another state to recover escheated or abandoned property must be presented in a form prescribed by the department. The department shall allow the claim if it determines that the other state is entitled to the abandoned property under (a) of this section.

The department shall require a state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this state and its officers and employees against liability on a claim for the property.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.400.
Action to establish claim.

A person aggrieved by a decision or action of the department under this chapter may apply to the department within 60 days after the mailing date of the department’s notice to the person, giving notice of the grievance and requesting an informal conference. At the conference the person aggrieved may present arguments and evidence relevant to the decision or action of the department. If the department determines that a correction is warranted, the department shall make the correction.

A person aggrieved by a decision or action of the department may apply to the department and request a formal hearing

in place of the informal conference provided for in (a) of this section, within 60 days after the mailing date of the department’s notice to the person; or

within 30 days after the decision resulting from an informal conference.

At the formal hearing, the administrative law judge from the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) may subpoena witnesses and may administer oaths and make inquiries necessary to determine the validity of the claim. The person aggrieved may present arguments and evidence relevant to the decision or action of the department. If, after the hearing, the department determines that a correction is warranted, the department shall make the correction.

A person aggrieved by the decision of the department may, within 30 days after the formal hearing and decision by the department, appeal to the superior court in the judicial district in which the person resides. The department shall give appellant access to the department’s file in the matter for preparation of the appeal. If, after the appeal is heard, it appears that the decision of the department was correct, the court shall confirm that decision. If incorrect the court shall determine the amount that the person aggrieved is entitled to recover and shall order the repayment. The department shall immediately pay the amount due and attach a certified copy of the judgment to the payment.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 50 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.410.
Election to take delivery.

The department may decline to receive property reported under this chapter. If the department elects not to receive custody of the property, the department shall notify the holder within 120 days after the holder files the report required under AS

34.45.280

.

A holder, with the written consent of the department and upon terms prescribed by the department, may report and deliver property before the property is presumed abandoned. Property delivered under this subsection shall be held by the department and is not presumed abandoned until the property would otherwise be presumed abandoned under this chapter.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.420.
Destruction or disposition of property having insubstantial commercial value.

If the department determines after investigation that property delivered under this chapter has insubstantial commercial value, the department may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property at any time.
An action or proceeding may not be maintained against the state or an officer of the state or against the holder because of an action taken by the department under this section.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.430.
Periods of limitation.

The expiration, before or after September 7, 1986, of a period of time specified by contract, statute, or court order, during which a claim for money or property may be made or during which an action or proceeding may be commenced or enforced to obtain payment of a claim for money or to recover property, does not prevent the money or property from being presumed abandoned, and does not affect a duty to file a report or to pay or deliver abandoned property to the department as required by AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.430

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)